South Dakota, session 2026, SB167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-3-55 be AMENDED:
13-3-55. Every public Each school district shall annually administer the same
academic achievement assessment to all students in grades three to eight, inclusive, and
in grade eleven. The assessment shall measure the academic progress of each student.
Every public school district shall annually administer to all students in at least two grade
levels an achievement test to assess writing skills. The assessment instruments shall be
provided by the Department of Education, and the department shall determine the two
grade levels to be tested. The tests shall be administered within timelines established by
the Department of Education by rules promulgated pursuant to chapter 1-26 starting in
the spring of the 2002-2003 school year. Each state-designed test shall be correlated with
the state's content standards. The assessments must measure the academic progress of
each student and must correspond to the state's content standards promulgated pursuant
to § 13-3-48.
The secretary of the Department of Education shall annually designate at least two
of these grade levels to take the writing skills achievement assessment provided by the
department.
A student must take any assessment administered by a school district if the student
is at least partially enrolled in the school district pursuant to § 13-28-51. For purposes of
this section, a student is partially enrolled in a school district if the student is enrolled in
a number of courses through the school district, the time for which, when averaged over
the whole school year, equals at least fifty percent of the number of hours in the school
term, as established by the board of the school district, pursuant to § 13-26-1.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.609.11 2 167
The South Dakota Board of Education Standards may shall promulgate rules
pursuant to chapter 1-26, to provide for administration of all the assessments and
establish the timeline for the administration of the assessments each year.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-3:
Each school district shall administer an academic achievement assessment to each
student in grade eleven.
On or before May first of each year, the South Dakota Board of Education Standards
shall review and approve a list of academic achievement assessments for students enrolled
in grade eleven. The assessments approved by the board must:
(1) Measure the academic progress of each student;
(2) Correspond to the state's content standards; and
(3) Allow for the variety of prospective academic or career pathways that a student
may follow upon high school graduation.
The Department of Education shall provide to each school district the list of
approved assessments.
Each student in grade eleven shall, in consultation with the school's guidance
counselor or other administrator, select the assessment that the student is to take to meet
the requirements of this section, from the list of approved courses provided by the
Department of Education.
The South Dakota Board of Education Standards shall promulgate rules, pursuant
to chapter 1-26, to establish the criteria by which the board determines whether an
assessment measures the academic progress of each student and corresponds to the
state's content standards, to establish the timeline for the administration of the
assessments each year, and to provide for the administration of the assessments.
Section 3. That § 13-3-84 be REPEALED.
If a student is partially enrolled in a school district pursuant to § 13-28-41 or 13-
28-51, and the student's enrollment is equal to or greater than fifty percent, that student
is required to take any academic achievement test administered by the school district
pursuant to § 13-3-55. If a student's partial enrollment in a school district is less than fifty
percent, the student is not required to take any academic achievement test administered
by the school district pursuant to § 13-3-55.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.